Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-159
Banks; trust department; authorization.

Any bank, having adopted or amended its articles of incorporation to authorize the conduct of a trust business as defined in the Nebraska Trust Company Act, may be further chartered by the director to transact a trust company business in a trust department in connection with such bank.

Laws 1959, c. 19, § 1, p. 143;

Laws 1961, c. 14, § 4, p. 107;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-1,118;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 59, p. 159;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 10.

Nebraska Trust Company Act, see section 8-201.01.